Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1

Substantive Provisions

5-6-101. County mayor — Term — Title.

Except in counties organized under the consolidated government provisions of the Constitution of Tennessee, article XI, § 9, the chief executive officer of each county shall be a county mayor elected in accordance with § 5-6-102 by the qualified voters of the county for a term of four (4) years or until a successor is elected and qualified.

The term of office for a county mayor shall begin on September 1 next succeeding the county mayor's election.

References to the chair of the county court and county judge appearing elsewhere in this code shall be deemed references to the county mayor.

The chief executive officer of each county shall be redesignated and hereafter referred to as the county mayor, except as provided in subdivision (d)(2). References to the term “county executive” appearing elsewhere in this code are to be deemed references to the county mayor.

Private acts enacted prior to March 28, 2007, designating the title of the chief executive officer of the county as “county executive” shall remain in full force and effect. No county may redesignate the county mayor as county executive by private act following March 28, 2007.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (d)(1) and (2), in any county having a population of not less than twenty thousand one hundred (20,100) nor more than twenty thousand two hundred (20,200), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the chief executive officer of the county shall be designated and hereafter referred to as the county executive.

Code 1858, § 4187 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 4); impl. am. Acts 1887, ch. 236, § 2; Shan., § 6004; Code 1932, § 10202; impl. am. Acts 1935, ch. 10, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10202; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 16; 1979, ch. 53, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-601; Acts 1981, ch. 219, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 568, § 1; 2007, ch. 3, § 1; 2011, ch. 107, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Judicial System in Tennessee and Potentialities for Reorganization — Judges in Tennessee (Elvin E. Overton), 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 514 (1965).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county executive (now county mayor) over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

County attorney serving as attorney for county highway department, OAG 99-044, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (3/1/99).

Officials elected as “county executives” in 2002 and redesignated as “county mayors” beginning July 1, 2003, are bound by their oath of office to perform their duties of office and refer to themselves henceforth as “county mayors,” except to the extent the use of any stationery or other office products with the title “county executive” that was printed prior to the effective date of the 2003 amendment, OAG 03-096, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (8/13/03).

There is no penalty for officials who refuse to refer to themselves as “county mayors” beginning July 1, 2003, OAG 03-096, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (8/13/03).

5-6-102. Election.

Election of the county mayor shall be in accordance with the following provisions:

In counties of Class 1 and counties of Class 2 having a county council form of county government as established by § 8-24-101, in counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand three hundred fifty (12,350) nor more than twelve thousand three hundred seventy-five (12,375), or not less than thirty-eight thousand eight hundred (38,800) nor more than thirty-eight thousand nine hundred (38,900), by the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, and in counties having a chair of the county court on May 11, 1978, the county mayor shall be elected in the regular August election in 1978 and every four (4) years thereafter.

In all other counties, the county mayor shall be elected in the regular August election in 1978 and every four (4) years thereafter.

Code 1858, § 4187 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 4); impl. am. Acts 1887, ch. 236, § 2; Shan., § 6004; Code 1932, § 10202; impl. am. Acts 1935, ch. 10, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10202; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-601 (b); Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-602; Acts 1981, ch. 219, § 3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Former § 5-6-102(2), concerning counties having an incumbent county judge elected in 1974, was deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Status of interim county mayor as member of county commission. OAG 11-2, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/11).

5-6-103. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. This section (Code 1858, § 4187 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 4); impl. am. Acts 1887, ch. 236, § 2; Shan., § 6004; Code 1932, § 10202; impl. am. Acts 1935, ch. 10, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10202; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-601(c); Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-603; Acts 1981, ch. 318, § 3), which provided a method for filling vacancies in the office of county judge during the transitional period ending in 1982, is obsolete. For provisions applicable to filling vacancies in the office of county executive (now county mayor), see § 5-1-104.

5-6-104. Qualifications.

The county mayor shall be:

A qualified voter of the county;

At least twenty-five (25) years of age; and

A resident of the county for one (1) full year prior to the date of filing a nominating petition for election to such office.

The county mayor shall continue to reside in the county during the county mayor's term of office, and shall not, during the county mayor's term of office, hold any other public office for profit.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 17; T.C.A., § 5-604; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Individual serving as county executive (now county mayor) and mayor, OAG 98-095, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 95 (4/29/98).

5-6-105. Compensation.

The county mayor shall devote full time to the duties and demands of the office unless the voters of the county, by means of a referendum authorized by Acts 1979, chapter 145, § 2, determine that such duties and demands are insufficient to require full-time action.

The county mayor shall receive for the county mayor's services such compensation as established in § 8-24-102.

Such minimum salary shall apply to a county mayor who devotes full time to such office.

The salary of a county mayor who devotes less than full time to such office shall be determined by resolution of the county legislative body.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 17; 1979, ch. 145, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-605; Acts 1982, ch. 890, § 1; 1996, ch. 936, § 2; 1998, ch. 590, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Section 2 of Acts 1979, ch. 145 reads:

“(a) In each county in which, on the effective date of this act, the county executive (now county mayor) devotes less than full time to the office, a referendum shall be called by the county election commission and shall be held concurrently with the 1980 August general election in order to allow the voters of the county to determine whether the duties and demands of the office require full time attention. If such voters determine that a full time county executive (now county mayor) is required, the position shall become full time effective September 1, 1982.

“(b) In each county in which, on September 1, 1982, the county executive (now county mayor) devotes less than full time to the office, upon receiving a certified copy of a resolution duly adopted by the county legislative body or a petition signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the qualified voters of the county requesting a referendum to determine whether the duties and demands of the office of county executive (now county mayor) require full time attention, the county election commission shall call and hold such referendum. Such referendum shall occur concurrently with the 1984 August general election or the next succeeding August general election occurring quadrennially after such 1984 election. The position if approved, shall become full time on September 1, 1986 or the next succeeding September 1st occurring quadrennially after such 1986 date.”

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-6-106. Powers and duties — Generally — Ex officio memberships — Appointments.

The county mayor shall be the chief executive officer of the county and shall have all the powers and duties formerly exercised by the county judge, county chair, or elected official exercising general supervision of the county government as provided by this chapter, other general law, special, local or private acts.

The county mayor shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member of the county legislative body. The county mayor or the county mayor's designated representative shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member of each committee of the county legislative body and of each board, commission or authority of the county government, except as provided by law or by action of the county legislative body.

In those circumstances not addressed by subdivision (b)(1), the county mayor may designate, from time to time, a professional staff member with appropriate training or a member of the county legislative body to sit in the county mayor's place on any board, authority or commission that the county mayor serves upon by virtue of holding the office of county mayor. Any such designee shall have the powers, including the power to vote, as are otherwise conferred upon the county mayor when serving upon such board, authority or commission. At any such meeting attended by the county mayor, only the county mayor shall exercise voting power.

Except as otherwise provided by general law, or special or private act, the county mayor shall appoint members of county boards and commissions and county department heads. Such appointees shall be subject to confirmation by the county legislative body, and in so doing, the legislative body may express its views fully and freely and shall vote for or against confirmation. The legislative body shall not seek or interview such prospective employees prior to their appointment by the county mayor. Such appointment and confirmation are not applicable to employees appointed by other elected county officials.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 17; 1979, ch. 80, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-606; Acts 1985, ch. 145, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Authority to solemnize marriages, § 36-3-301.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 37.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Appointment of county officials, OAG 97-068, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 67 (5/12/97).

Appointment of emergency communication district board of directors, OAG 94-024, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (3/9/94).

Authority of county executive (now county mayor) over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

Lewis County highway advisory commission. OAG 12-74, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (7/19/12).

Where county commission has hired an employee in the valid exercise of its authority, a county mayor may not unilaterally terminate that employee unless expressly authorized. Nor may a county mayor defund or abolish an entire county department without the approval of the county commission. OAG 14-28, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/7/14).

5-6-107. Powers and duties — Action on legislation.

The county mayor has the power of veto with respect to resolutions of the county legislative body.

Such veto shall apply only to legislative resolutions and shall not apply to resolutions in which the legislative body is exercising administrative or appellate authority.

Every resolution shall be submitted to the county mayor.

If the county mayor signs it, the resolution shall become effective immediately or at a later date if the resolution so provides.

If the county mayor vetoes the resolution, the county mayor shall return it to the county legislative body for action on the county mayor's veto, in which case it shall become effective only upon subsequent passage by a majority of all the members comprising the county legislative body.

Such passage must take place within twenty (20) days of receiving the county mayor's message of veto or at the next regular meeting of the county legislative body, whichever is later.

If the county mayor fails either to sign or to veto a resolution and to report the county mayor's action to the county legislative body within ten (10) days after the resolution is submitted to the county mayor, the resolution shall become effective without the county mayor's signature upon the expiration of the ten-day period or at a later date if the resolution so provides.

The veto may not be exercised with respect to specific items or parts of items in the annual county budget, and may only be exercised with respect to the whole.

This section shall not be applicable to counties of Class 1 as established by § 8-24-101, that have comparable provisions in special or private acts establishing a veto power in the county mayor.

This section shall not be applicable in any county in which the county mayor is elected as chair of the county legislative body as provided in § 5-5-103.

This section shall be applicable in counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand three hundred fifty (12,350) nor more than twelve thousand three hundred seventy-five (12,375), by the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall be applicable in counties having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand eight hundred (38,800) nor more than thirty-eight thousand nine hundred (38,900), by the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 18; 1979, ch. 53, § 2; T.C.A., § 5-607; Acts 1988, ch. 981, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

5-6-108. Powers and duties — County property and accounts.

The county mayor shall be the accounting officer and general agent of the county; and, as such, the county mayor shall have power, and it shall be the county mayor's duty to:

Have the care and custody of all the county property, except such as is by law placed in the custody of other officers;

Appoint an agent or attorney to take care of such property, and fix such agent's or attorney's compensation;

Control all books, papers and instruments pertaining to the county mayor's office;

Audit all claims for money against the county;

Draw, without seal, all warrants upon the county treasury;

Audit and settle the accounts of the county trustee, and those of any other collector or receiver of county revenue, taxes, or incomes, payable into the county treasury, and those of any persons entrusted to receive or expend any money of the county;

Require such officers or persons to render and settle their accounts as directed by law, or by the authority under which they act;

Enter in a book, to be known as the warrant book, in the order of issuance, the number, date, amount and name of the drawee of each warrant drawn upon the treasury;

Keep in a suitable book an account of the receipts and expenditures of the county, so as to show clearly the assets of the county, and the debts payable to and by it, balancing the account semiannually, and generally to superintend the financial concerns of the county; and

Report, in writing, semiannually, to the county legislative body all moneys received and paid out, and a complete statement of the financial condition of the county, and the county mayor shall settle the county mayor's accounts once every year.

Code 1858, § 421 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 253, § 8; 1857-1858, ch. 38, § 8); impl. am. Acts 1859-1860, ch. 120, § 8; Acts 1879, ch. 76, § 3; Shan., § 517; Code 1932, § 769; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-608; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Motion against collector for failure to settle accounts, § 67-1-1602.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 12; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 9; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 4.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county executive (now county mayor) over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

County executive's (now county mayor's) authority over sheriff's department purchasing, OAG 99-051, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (3/4/99).

5-6-109. Powers and duties — Bond.

All county mayors shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, enter into an official bond prepared in accordance with title 8, chapter 19, to be approved by the county legislative bodies, in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or in a greater sum as the county legislative body may determine, payable to the state, for the use of their respective counties, conditioned for the faithful discharge of their duties as accounting officers and general agents of their counties, during their official terms, as set forth in § 5-6-108. The bond shall be recorded in the office of the county register of deeds and transmitted to the office of the county clerk for safekeeping.

Acts 1879, ch. 76, § 1; Shan., § 516; Code 1932, § 768; Acts 1977, ch. 270, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-609; Acts 1998, ch. 677, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2013, ch. 315, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. County executive's [now county mayor's] authority over sheriff's department purchasing, OAG 99-051, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (3/4/99).

5-6-110. Powers and duties — Duties as financial officer.

It is the duty of the county mayor to:

Draw the county mayor's warrant on the county trustee for the payment of any judgment recovered against, or debt due from, the county;

Reduce to writing the testimony of any witness examined by the county mayor touching any settlement, and file the same therewith;

Minutely examine and settle the accounts of county officers, referring to the records, documents, dockets and papers in the offices to verify each item;

Report to the county legislative body the settlements, under oath that the county mayor believes that the report contains a true schedule of the revenue collected by each officer, and that the county mayor is bound by law to pay to the county trustee;

Make duplicates of the settlements with the clerks of the circuit, chancery and appellate courts, and deliver one (1) of the duplicates to the county clerk, and file the others in each of the clerk's offices.

Code 1858, § 525; Acts 1879, ch. 162, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 602, § 45; Shan., § 669; Code 1932, § 1065; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 51; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-610; Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 10; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county executive [now county mayor] over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

County executive's [now county mayor's] authority over sheriff's department purchasing, OAG 99-051, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (3/4/99).

5-6-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-6-111 (Acts 1879, ch. 162, § 3; Shan., § 670; Code 1932, § 1066; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 51; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-611), concerning failure by the county executive to report on the privilege tax, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 11, effective May 19, 1998.

5-6-112. Powers and duties — Powers as financial officer.

The county mayor has the power to:

If there is no county attorney, employ or retain counsel, or both, to advise the county mayor and the members of the county legislative body as to their legal rights as such members, to prepare and draft resolutions for passage by the body, and to represent the county either as plaintiff or defendant in such suits as may be brought by or against the county, except suits by the county to collect delinquent taxes, which counsel shall be entitled to a reasonable fee for such counsel's services or retention, or both, to be fixed by a majority vote of the members of the county legislative body at one (1) of its regular sessions, to be paid out of the county general fund;

Require the clerks of the several courts to produce to the county mayor all records, documents, dockets and papers in their offices relating to each office, and tending to give information in relation to the county revenue collected by such officer for the use of the county;

Call or summon before the county mayor all witnesses having any knowledge relating to the county revenue;

Demand of each of the clerks of the several courts an account, on oath, of all moneys by such clerk collected for the use of the county, setting forth each separate item, from whom and at what time received, and the source from which it was derived;

Call the collectors of the county tax, at the time prescribed by law, for the purpose of making a final settlement for the year last past;

Call the county trustee to a settlement when required by law, or by the county legislative body;

Procure, at the expense of the county, a well bound book, and therein cause to be entered, on the left-hand pages, two (2) regular accounts, one (1) against the collectors of taxes and revenue, the other against the county trustee, stating the amount of all the taxes for which the collectors are accountable, and each item with which each of the officers is chargeable, on behalf of the county, expressing the manner in which it became due and owing, or by whom paid. And, on the right-hand page, opposite the debits, the county mayor shall cause to be entered each item or credit to which either of the officers is entitled, plainly showing the amount thereof and to whom paid;

Transfer the balance, if any, either for or against the county, to their respective accounts to be opened for the ensuing year, so that the county mayor may be enabled, when required by the county legislative body, plainly to show the state and condition of the county treasury, and in what manner the moneys thereof have been disbursed; and

Demand of the county clerk a list of the amount of taxes put into the hands of the collector, and due and owing for that year, together with sufficient vouchers, showing the amount of moneys by such clerk paid to the trustee, as required by law, for fines and forfeitures, and the amount of all appropriations made for the year by the county legislative body, with all necessary documents and vouchers showing any receipts or disbursements of county moneys.

Code 1858, § 520; Shan., § 660; mod. Code 1932, § 1059; Acts 1947, ch. 114, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1059; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 14, § 1; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-612; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 254; 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county executive (now county mayor) over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

County attorney serving as attorney for county highway department, OAG 99-044, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (3/1/99).

5-6-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-6-113 (Code 1858, § 423; Acts 1877, ch. 106, § 3; Shan., § 519; Code 1932, § 771; Acts 1963, ch. 253, §§ 1-3; 1967, ch. 291, § 1; modified; Acts 1971, ch. 206, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-613), concerning powers and duties and compensation as the financial officer, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 585, § 1, effective March 10, 2000.

5-6-114. Powers and duties — Acting for clerk.

When the county clerk is incompetent, because of interest or relationship, to do or perform any official act required by law to be done by the county clerk, it shall be lawful, and is made the duty of the county mayor to do and perform that act.

Acts 1871, ch. 42, § 1; Shan., § 676; Code 1932, § 1072; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-614; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Incompetency of clerk, § 18-6-112.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-6-115. Incompetency of clerk — Additional provisions.

When the county clerk is incompetent to take and state any account, the same shall be taken and stated by a special commissioner, to be appointed by the county legislative body as provided by law.

Acts 1871, ch. 42, § 1; Shan., § 677; Code 1932, § 1073; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-615.

Cross-References. Incompetency of clerk, § 18-6-112.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

5-6-116. Clerical assistants.

The county mayor for each county may employ one (1) or more clerical assistants as may be necessary for the performance of the county mayor's official duties. The county mayor shall establish the compensation of any such assistant within the amount appropriated for such purpose by the county legislative body.

Acts 1959, ch. 196, § 1; 1976, ch. 726, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, § 21; 1979, ch. 130, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-616; Acts 1998, ch. 609, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257 (1959).

5-6-117, 5-6-118. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 5-6-117 and 5-6-118 (Acts 1959, ch. 196, §§ 2, 3; 1978, ch. 934, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 5-617, 5-618), concerning salaries of clerical assistants, were repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 609, §§ 2 and 3, effective March 12, 1998.

5-6-119. [Transferred.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 5-6-119, concerning a citizen transportation area, was transferred to § 65-15-127 in 1986, and subsequently to § 65-15-115 in 2015, by authority of the Tennessee code commission.

5-6-120. Transfer of duties to water and wastewater treatment authorities.

The duties of the county mayor in regard to any petition filed pursuant to title 7, chapter 82, are transferred to the water and wastewater treatment authority board under title 68, chapter 221, part 6 in any county that has created such authority. The preceding sentence does not apply to any petition by any governmental entity or state instrumentality that does not purport to adjust or otherwise modify any territory included in the service area of a water and wastewater treatment authority. Such petitions may be granted if the board determines in its sole discretion that the public convenience and necessity require the same. The general assembly enacts this section as a statement of its intent that this section is a clarification of title 68, chapter 221, part 6. From and after the creation of a water and wastewater treatment authority and the establishment of its service area, the authority shall be the sole and exclusive provider of its authorized services in its service area. The designated service area for any particular function or service shall not include any area located within the boundaries of another governmental entity providing the same function or service on the date the service area is established. Different service areas may be established for different functions or services. The authority may cede all or any portion of its functions or service area to another governmental entity upon the board determining in its sole discretion that the public convenience and necessity require the same.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the transfer of duties as provided in subdivision (a)(1) do not apply to a county which:

Is served by a water and wastewater treatment authority that does not provide water service;

Has its water provided by more than five (5) utility districts; and

Has, under state law, had its county mayor hear petitions of utility districts.

The authority granted in this section shall prevail over any other law to the contrary for all water and wastewater service providers proposing to provide such services in the service area of the authority. Any city proposing to provide such services in the service area of the authority shall have authorization to do so only by filing a petition in the manner established by this section and receiving a cession by the authority.

Acts 1988, ch. 981, § 2; 1989, ch. 580, § 1; 1995, ch. 77, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2018, ch. 811, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the second sentence in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 811, § 2. April 24, 2018.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of water and wastewater treatment authority outside of its service area. OAG 11-53, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (6/30/11).

Municipality’s right to provide water services in annexed territory; conflict between T.C.A. §§ 5-6-120 and 6-51-111 and implied repeal of T.C.A. § 5-6-120 by T.C.A. § 6-51-111(e) to the extent of the inconsistency between the two statutes. OAG 14-19, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/14/14).

5-6-121. County fire marshal — Appointment — Compensation — Qualifications.

The county mayor for each county may appoint a fire marshal, whose duty shall be to coordinate the efforts of volunteer fire departments, enforce local fire safety regulations and assist in the prevention of fire and arson. If a county fire marshal is employed, the county mayor shall establish the compensation of the county fire marshal within the amount appropriated for such purpose by the county legislative body.

The county fire marshal shall:

Have at least five (5) years of experience as a firefighter;

Have and maintain certification from the state fire marshal in accordance with § 68-120-113; and

Serve at the pleasure of the county mayor.

Acts 2008, ch. 843, § 1.